Washington statutes.
RCW 26.44.140

Treatment for abusive person removed from home.

The court shall require that an individual who, while acting in a parental role, has physically or sexually abused a child and has been removed from the home pursuant to a court order issued in a proceeding under chapter 13.34 RCW, prior to being permitted to reside in the home where the child resides, complete the treatment and education requirements necessary to protect the child from future abuse. The court may require the individual to continue treatment as a condition for remaining in the home where the child resides. Unless a parent, custodian, or guardian has been convicted of the crime for the acts of abuse determined in a fact-finding hearing under chapter 13.34 RCW, such person shall not be required to admit guilt in order to begin to fulfill any necessary treatment and education requirements under this section.

The department or supervising agency shall be responsible for advising the court as to appropriate treatment and education requirements, providing referrals to the individual, monitoring and assessing the individual's progress, informing the court of such progress, and providing recommendations to the court.

The person removed from the home shall pay for these services unless the person is otherwise eligible to receive financial assistance in paying for such services. Nothing in this section shall be construed to create in any person an entitlement to services or financial assistance in paying for services.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 327; 1997 c 344 s 1; 1991 c 301 s 15; 1990 c 3 s 1301.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 ss 102, 104-115, 201-227, 301-337, 401-419, 501-513, 801-803, and 805-822: See note following RCW 43.216.025.

Conflict with federal requirements—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6: See RCW 43.216.908.

Finding—1991 c 301: See note following RCW 10.99.020.